Hawaii, session 2026, SB3037.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that illegal fireworks pose a serious and ongoing threat to public safety in Hawaii, causing explosions, fires, and loss of life. Despite existing laws regulating the importation and sale of fireworks, unlawful activity continues, revealing gaps in enforcement that allow repeat offenders to remain in business. The legislature further finds that a Civil Beat investigation in 2025 documented connections between Pacific Fireworks and a 2022 shipment of approximately $2.7 million worth of illegal pyrotechnics discovered inside a Matson shipping container at Honolulu harbor.  Despite these findings, Pacific Fireworks has continued to obtain retail licenses and sell fireworks in the State, as current law does not clearly authorize agencies to deny licenses based on prior violations or related enforcement actions. The legislature determines that current law does not adequately prevent individuals or companies that have violated fireworks laws from resuming the importation or sale of fireworks.  This gap weakens enforcement efforts and places the public at continued risk. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit any person or company, including responsible individuals associated with a company, that has been determined by a court or appropriate agency to have violated laws relating to the importation or sale of illegal fireworks from importing, selling, or obtaining licenses to import or sell fireworks in the State, thereby strengthening accountability and protecting public safety. SECTION 2. Section 132D-8, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b)  Each storage, wholesaling, and retailing site shall be required to obtain a separate license. The license shall specify the date of issuance or effect and the date of expiration, which shall be March 31 of each year.  The application shall be made on a form setting forth the date upon which the storage or distribution are to begin, the address of the location of the licensee, and the name of the proprietor or, if a partnership, the name of the partnership and the names of all partners or, if a corporation, the name of the corporation and the names of its officers.  Any license issued pursuant to this chapter [may] shall be revoked by the county if the licensee violates any provision of this chapter or if the licensee stores or handles the fireworks in a manner that presents an unreasonable safety hazard. Any licensee that violates any provision of this chapter shall be prohibited from obtaining a new license." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________